Illinois, session 104th, SB97.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 521B-20 and 21B-40 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/21B-20)7    Sec. 21B-20. Types of licenses. The State Board of 8Education shall implement a system of educator licensure, 9whereby individuals employed in school districts who are 10required to be licensed must have one of the following 11licenses: (i) a professional educator license; (ii) an 12educator license with stipulations; (iii) a substitute 13teaching license; or (iv) until June 30, 2028, a short-term 14substitute teaching license. References in law regarding 15individuals certified or certificated or required to be 16certified or certificated under Article 21 of this Code shall 17also include individuals licensed or required to be licensed 18under this Article. The first year of all licenses ends on June 1930 following one full year of the license being issued.20    The State Board of Education, in consultation with the 21State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, may adopt such 22rules as may be necessary to govern the requirements for 23licenses and endorsements under this Section.   SB0097- 2 -LRB104 04026 LNS 14050 b1        (1) Professional Educator License. Persons who (i) 2    have successfully completed an approved educator 3    preparation program and are recommended for licensure by 4    the Illinois institution offering the educator preparation 5    program, (ii) have successfully completed the required 6    testing under Section 21B-30 of this Code, (iii) have 7    successfully completed coursework on the psychology of, 8    the identification of, and the methods of instruction for 9    the exceptional child, including, without limitation, 10    children with learning disabilities, (iv) have 11    successfully completed coursework in methods of reading 12    and reading in the content area, and (v) have met all other 13    criteria established by rule of the State Board of 14    Education shall be issued a Professional Educator License. 15    All Professional Educator Licenses are valid until June 30 16    immediately following 5 years of the license being issued. 17    The Professional Educator License shall be endorsed with 18    specific areas and grade levels in which the individual is 19    eligible to practice. For an early childhood education 20    endorsement, an individual may satisfy the student 21    teaching requirement of his or her early childhood teacher 22    preparation program through placement in a setting with 23    children from birth through grade 2, and the individual 24    may be paid and receive credit while student teaching. The 25    student teaching experience must meet the requirements of 26    and be approved by the individual's early childhood   SB0097- 3 -LRB104 04026 LNS 14050 b1    teacher preparation program.2        Individuals can receive subsequent endorsements on the 3    Professional Educator License. Subsequent endorsements 4    shall require a minimum of 24 semester hours of coursework 5    in the endorsement area and passage of the applicable 6    content area test, unless otherwise specified by rule.7        (2) Educator License with Stipulations. An Educator 8    License with Stipulations shall be issued an endorsement 9    that limits the license holder to one particular position 10    or does not require completion of an approved educator 11    program or both.12        An individual with an Educator License with 13    Stipulations must not be employed by a school district or 14    any other entity to replace any presently employed teacher 15    who otherwise would not be replaced for any reason.16        An Educator License with Stipulations may be issued 17    with the following endorsements:18            (A) (Blank). 19            (B) Alternative provisional educator. An 20        alternative provisional educator endorsement on an 21        Educator License with Stipulations may be issued to an 22        applicant who, at the time of applying for the 23        endorsement, has done all of the following:24                (i) Graduated from a regionally accredited 25            college or university with a minimum of a 26            bachelor's degree.  SB0097- 4 -LRB104 04026 LNS 14050 b1                (ii) Successfully completed the first phase of 2            the Alternative Educator Licensure Program for 3            Teachers, as described in Section 21B-50 of this 4            Code.5                (iii) Passed a content area test, as required 6            under Section 21B-30 of this Code.7        The alternative provisional educator endorsement is 8    valid for 2 years of teaching and may be renewed for a 9    third year by an individual meeting the requirements set 10    forth in Section 21B-50 of this Code. 11            (C) Alternative provisional superintendent. An 12        alternative provisional superintendent endorsement on 13        an Educator License with Stipulations entitles the 14        holder to serve only as a superintendent or assistant 15        superintendent in a school district's central office. 16        This endorsement may only be issued to an applicant 17        who, at the time of applying for the endorsement, has 18        done all of the following:19                (i) Graduated from a regionally accredited 20            college or university with a minimum of a master's 21            degree in a management field other than education.22                (ii) Been employed for a period of at least 5 23            years in a management level position in a field 24            other than education.25                (iii) Successfully completed the first phase 26            of an alternative route to superintendent   SB0097- 5 -LRB104 04026 LNS 14050 b1            endorsement program, as provided in Section 21B-55 2            of this Code.3                (iv) Passed a content area test required under 4            Section 21B-30 of this Code.5            The endorsement is valid for 2 fiscal years in 6        order to complete one full year of serving as a 7        superintendent or assistant superintendent.8            (D) (Blank).9            (E) Career and technical educator. A career and 10        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 11        with Stipulations may be issued to an applicant who 12        has a minimum of 60 semester hours of coursework from a 13        regionally accredited institution of higher education 14        or an accredited trade and technical institution and 15        has a minimum of 2,000 hours of experience outside of 16        education in each area to be taught.17            The career and technical educator endorsement on 18        an Educator License with Stipulations is valid until 19        June 30 immediately following 5 years of the 20        endorsement being issued and may be renewed.21            An individual who holds a valid career and 22        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 23        with Stipulations but does not hold a bachelor's 24        degree may substitute teach in career and technical 25        education classrooms. 26            An individual who holds a valid career and   SB0097- 6 -LRB104 04026 LNS 14050 b1        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 2        with Stipulations is entitled to all of the rights and 3        privileges granted to a holder of a Professional 4        Educator License. 5            (F) (Blank).6            (G) Transitional bilingual educator. A 7        transitional bilingual educator endorsement on an 8        Educator License with Stipulations may be issued for 9        the purpose of providing instruction in accordance 10        with Article 14C of this Code to an applicant who 11        provides satisfactory evidence that he or she meets 12        all of the following requirements:13                (i) Possesses adequate speaking, reading, and 14            writing ability in the language other than English 15            in which transitional bilingual education is 16            offered.17                (ii) Has the ability to successfully 18            communicate in English.19                (iii) Either possessed, within 5 years 20            previous to his or her applying for a transitional 21            bilingual educator endorsement, a valid and 22            comparable teaching certificate or comparable 23            authorization issued by a foreign country or holds 24            a degree from an institution of higher learning in 25            a foreign country that the State Educator 26            Preparation and Licensure Board determines to be   SB0097- 7 -LRB104 04026 LNS 14050 b1            the equivalent of a bachelor's degree from a 2            regionally accredited institution of higher 3            learning in the United States.4            A transitional bilingual educator endorsement 5        shall be valid for prekindergarten through grade 12, 6        is valid until June 30 immediately following 5 years 7        of the endorsement being issued, and shall not be 8        renewed.9            Persons holding a transitional bilingual educator 10        endorsement shall not be employed to replace any 11        presently employed teacher who otherwise would not be 12        replaced for any reason. 13            (H) Language endorsement. In an effort to 14        alleviate the shortage of teachers speaking a language 15        other than English in the public schools, an 16        individual who holds an Educator License with 17        Stipulations may also apply for a language 18        endorsement, provided that the applicant provides 19        satisfactory evidence that he or she meets all of the 20        following requirements:21                (i) Holds a transitional bilingual 22            endorsement. 23                (ii) Has demonstrated proficiency in the 24            language for which the endorsement is to be issued 25            by passing the applicable language content test 26            required by the State Board of Education.  SB0097- 8 -LRB104 04026 LNS 14050 b1                (iii) Holds a bachelor's degree or higher from 2            a regionally accredited institution of higher 3            education or, for individuals educated in a 4            country other than the United States, holds a 5            degree from an institution of higher learning in a 6            foreign country that the State Educator 7            Preparation and Licensure Board determines to be 8            the equivalent of a bachelor's degree from a 9            regionally accredited institution of higher 10            learning in the United States.11                (iv) (Blank).12            A language endorsement on an Educator License with 13        Stipulations is valid for prekindergarten through 14        grade 12 for the same validity period as the 15        individual's transitional bilingual educator 16        endorsement on the Educator License with Stipulations 17        and shall not be renewed.18            (I) Visiting international educator. A visiting 19        international educator endorsement on an Educator 20        License with Stipulations may be issued to an 21        individual who is being recruited by a particular 22        school district that conducts formal recruitment 23        programs outside of the United States to secure the 24        services of qualified teachers and who meets all of 25        the following requirements:26                (i) Holds the equivalent of a minimum of a   SB0097- 9 -LRB104 04026 LNS 14050 b1            bachelor's degree issued in the United States.2                (ii) Has been prepared as a teacher at the 3            grade level for which he or she will be employed.4                (iii) Has adequate content knowledge in the 5            subject to be taught.6                (iv) Has an adequate command of the English 7            language.8            A holder of a visiting international educator 9        endorsement on an Educator License with Stipulations 10        shall be permitted to teach in bilingual education 11        programs in the language that was the medium of 12        instruction in his or her teacher preparation program, 13        provided that he or she passes the English Language 14        Proficiency Examination or another test of writing 15        skills in English identified by the State Board of 16        Education, in consultation with the State Educator 17        Preparation and Licensure Board.18            A visiting international educator endorsement on 19        an Educator License with Stipulations is valid for 5 20        years and shall not be renewed.21            (J) Paraprofessional educator. A paraprofessional 22        educator endorsement on an Educator License with 23        Stipulations may be issued to an applicant who holds a 24        high school diploma or its recognized equivalent and 25        (i) holds an associate's degree or a minimum of 60 26        semester hours of credit from a regionally accredited   SB0097- 10 -LRB104 04026 LNS 14050 b1        institution of higher education; (ii) has passed a 2        paraprofessional competency test under subsection 3        (c-5) of Section 21B-30; or (iii) is at least 18 years 4        of age and will be using the Educator License with 5        Stipulations exclusively for grades prekindergarten 6        through grade 8, until the individual reaches the age 7        of 19 years and otherwise meets the criteria for a 8        paraprofessional educator endorsement pursuant to this 9        subparagraph (J). The paraprofessional educator 10        endorsement is valid until June 30 immediately 11        following 5 years of the endorsement being issued and 12        may be renewed through application and payment of the 13        appropriate fee, as required under Section 21B-40 of 14        this Code. An individual who holds only a 15        paraprofessional educator endorsement is not subject 16        to additional requirements in order to renew the 17        endorsement.18            (K) Chief school business official. A chief school 19        business official endorsement on an Educator License 20        with Stipulations may be issued to an applicant who 21        qualifies by having a master's degree or higher, 2 22        years of full-time administrative experience in school 23        business management or 2 years of university-approved 24        practical experience, and a minimum of 24 semester 25        hours of graduate credit in a program approved by the 26        State Board of Education for the preparation of school   SB0097- 11 -LRB104 04026 LNS 14050 b1        business administrators and by passage of the 2        applicable State tests, including an applicable 3        content area test. 4            The chief school business official endorsement may 5        also be affixed to the Educator License with 6        Stipulations of any holder who qualifies by having a 7        master's degree in business administration, finance, 8        accounting, or public administration and who completes 9        an additional 6 semester hours of internship in school 10        business management from a regionally accredited 11        institution of higher education and passes the 12        applicable State tests, including an applicable 13        content area test. This endorsement shall be required 14        for any individual employed as a chief school business 15        official. 16            The chief school business official endorsement on 17        an Educator License with Stipulations is valid until 18        June 30 immediately following 5 years of the 19        endorsement being issued and may be renewed if the 20        license holder completes renewal requirements as 21        required for individuals who hold a Professional 22        Educator License endorsed for chief school business 23        official under Section 21B-45 of this Code and such 24        rules as may be adopted by the State Board of 25        Education. 26            The State Board of Education shall adopt any rules   SB0097- 12 -LRB104 04026 LNS 14050 b1        necessary to implement Public Act 100-288.2            (L) Provisional in-state educator. A provisional 3        in-state educator endorsement on an Educator License 4        with Stipulations may be issued to a candidate who has 5        completed an Illinois-approved educator preparation 6        program at an Illinois institution of higher education 7        and who has not successfully completed an 8        evidence-based assessment of teacher effectiveness but 9        who meets all of the following requirements: 10                (i) Holds at least a bachelor's degree.11                (ii) Has completed an approved educator 12            preparation program at an Illinois institution.13                (iii) Has passed an applicable content area 14            test, as required by Section 21B-30 of this Code.15                (iv) Has attempted an evidence-based 16            assessment of teacher effectiveness and received a 17            minimum score on that assessment, as established 18            by the State Board of Education in consultation 19            with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure 20            Board.21            A provisional in-state educator endorsement on an 22        Educator License with Stipulations is valid for one 23        full fiscal year after the date of issuance and may not 24        be renewed.25            (M) (Blank).26            (N) Specialized services. A specialized services   SB0097- 13 -LRB104 04026 LNS 14050 b1        endorsement on an Educator License with Stipulations 2        may be issued as defined and specified by rule. 3            (O) Provisional career and technical educator. A 4        provisional career and technical educator endorsement 5        on an Educator License with Stipulations may be issued 6        to an applicant who has a minimum of 8,000 hours of 7        work experience in the skill for which the applicant 8        is seeking the endorsement. Each employing school 9        board and regional office of education shall provide 10        verification, in writing, to the State Superintendent 11        of Education at the time the application is submitted 12        that no qualified teacher holding a Professional 13        Educator License or an Educator License with 14        Stipulations with a career and technical educator 15        endorsement is available to teach and that actual 16        circumstances require such issuance.17            A provisional career and technical educator 18        endorsement on an Educator License with Stipulations 19        is valid until June 30 immediately following 5 years 20        of the endorsement being issued and may be renewed.21            An individual who holds a provisional career and 22        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 23        with Stipulations may teach as a substitute teacher in 24        career and technical education classrooms. 25            An individual who holds a provisional career and 26        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License   SB0097- 14 -LRB104 04026 LNS 14050 b1        with Stipulations is entitled to all of the rights and 2        privileges granted to a holder of a Professional 3        Educator License. 4        (3) Substitute Teaching License. A Substitute Teaching 5    License may be issued to qualified applicants for 6    substitute teaching in all grades of the public schools, 7    prekindergarten through grade 12. Substitute Teaching 8    Licenses are not eligible for endorsements. Applicants for 9    a Substitute Teaching License must hold a bachelor's 10    degree or higher from a regionally accredited institution 11    of higher education or must be enrolled in an approved 12    educator preparation program in this State and have either 13    earned at least 75 90 credit hours or completed 3 14    semesters in an educator preparation program.15        Substitute Teaching Licenses are valid for 5 years.16        Substitute Teaching Licenses are valid for substitute 17    teaching in every county of this State. If an individual 18    has had his or her Professional Educator License or 19    Educator License with Stipulations suspended or revoked, 20    then that individual is not eligible to obtain a 21    Substitute Teaching License.22        A substitute teacher may only teach in the place of a 23    licensed teacher who is under contract with the employing 24    board. If, however, there is no licensed teacher under 25    contract because of an emergency situation, then a 26    district may employ a substitute teacher for no longer   SB0097- 15 -LRB104 04026 LNS 14050 b1    than 30 calendar days per each vacant position in the 2    district if the district notifies the appropriate regional 3    office of education within 5 business days after the 4    employment of the substitute teacher in that vacant 5    position. A district may continue to employ that same 6    substitute teacher in that same vacant position for 90 7    calendar days or until the end of the semester, whichever 8    is greater, if, prior to the expiration of the 9    30-calendar-day period then current, the district files a 10    written request with the appropriate regional office of 11    education for a 30-calendar-day extension on the basis 12    that the position remains vacant and the district 13    continues to actively seek qualified candidates and 14    provides documentation that it has provided training 15    specific to the position, including training on meeting 16    the needs of students with disabilities and English 17    learners if applicable. Each extension request shall be 18    granted in writing by the regional office of education. An 19    emergency situation is one in which an unforeseen vacancy 20    has occurred and (i) a teacher is unexpectedly unable to 21    fulfill his or her contractual duties or (ii) teacher 22    capacity needs of the district exceed previous indications 23    or vacancies are unfilled due to a lack of qualified 24    candidates, and the district is actively engaged in 25    advertising to hire a fully licensed teacher for the 26    vacant position.  SB0097- 16 -LRB104 04026 LNS 14050 b1        There is no limit on the number of days that a 2    substitute teacher may teach in a single school district, 3    provided that no substitute teacher may teach for longer 4    than 120 days beginning with the 2021-2022 school year 5    through the 2022-2023 school year, otherwise 90 school 6    days for any one licensed teacher under contract in the 7    same school year. A substitute teacher who holds a 8    Professional Educator License or Educator License with 9    Stipulations shall not teach for more than 120 school days 10    for any one licensed teacher under contract in the same 11    school year. The limitations in this paragraph (3) on the 12    number of days a substitute teacher may be employed do not 13    apply to any school district operating under Article 34 of 14    this Code.15        A school district may not require an individual who 16    holds a valid Professional Educator License or Educator 17    License with Stipulations to seek or hold a Substitute 18    Teaching License to teach as a substitute teacher. A 19    school district may not require an individual who retired 20    within the last 5 years while holding a valid Professional 21    Educator License or Educator License with Stipulations to 22    seek or hold a Substitute Teaching License to teach as a 23    substitute teacher if substitute teaching for no more than 24    one year. 25        (4) Short-Term Substitute Teaching License. Beginning 26    on July 1, 2018 and until June 30, 2028, applicants may   SB0097- 17 -LRB104 04026 LNS 14050 b1    apply to the State Board of Education for issuance of a 2    Short-Term Substitute Teaching License. A Short-Term 3    Substitute Teaching License may be issued to a qualified 4    applicant for substitute teaching in all grades of the 5    public schools, prekindergarten through grade 12. 6    Short-Term Substitute Teaching Licenses are not eligible 7    for endorsements. Applicants for a Short-Term Substitute 8    Teaching License must hold an associate's degree or have 9    completed at least 60 credit hours from a regionally 10    accredited institution of higher education.11        Short-Term Substitute Teaching Licenses are valid for 12    substitute teaching in every county of this State. If an 13    individual has had his or her Professional Educator 14    License or Educator License with Stipulations suspended or 15    revoked, then that individual is not eligible to obtain a 16    Short-Term Substitute Teaching License.17        The provisions of Sections 10-21.9 and 34-18.5 of this 18    Code apply to short-term substitute teachers. 19        An individual holding a Short-Term Substitute Teaching 20    License may teach no more than 15 consecutive days per 21    licensed teacher who is under contract. For teacher 22    absences lasting 6 or more days per licensed teacher who 23    is under contract, a school district may not hire an 24    individual holding a Short-Term Substitute Teaching 25    License, unless the Governor has declared a disaster due 26    to a public health emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the   SB0097- 18 -LRB104 04026 LNS 14050 b1    Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act. An individual 2    holding a Short-Term Substitute Teaching License must 3    complete the training program under Section 10-20.67 or 4    34-18.60 of this Code to be eligible to teach at a public 5    school. Short-Term Substitute Teaching Licenses under this 6    Section are valid for 5 years. 7(Source: P.A. 102-711, eff. 1-1-23; 102-712, eff. 4-27-22; 8102-713, eff. 1-1-23; 102-717, eff. 4-29-22; 102-894, eff. 95-20-22; 103-111, eff. 6-29-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 10103-193, eff. 1-1-24; 103-564, eff. 11-17-23; 103-617, eff. 117-1-24.) 12    (105 ILCS 5/21B-40)13    Sec. 21B-40. Fees.14    (a) Beginning with the start of the new licensure system 15established pursuant to this Article, the following fees shall 16be charged to applicants:17        (1) A $100 application fee for a Professional Educator 18    License or an Educator License with Stipulations.19        (1.5) A $50 application fee for a Substitute Teaching 20    License. However, a retired educator may not be charged an 21    application fee for a Substitute Teaching License if the 22    applicant (i) retired while holding a valid Professional 23    Educator License or Educator License with Stipulations, 24    (ii) retired no more than 5 years before applying for the 25    Substitute Teaching License, and (iii) received a   SB0097- 19 -LRB104 04026 LNS 14050 b1    performance rating of "excellent" or "proficient" under 2    Article 24A on the last evaluation received before 3    retirement. If the application for a Substitute Teaching 4    License is made and granted after July 1, 2017, the 5    licensee may apply for a refund of the application fee 6    within 18 months of issuance of the new license and shall 7    be issued that refund by the State Board of Education if 8    the licensee provides evidence to the State Board of 9    Education that the licensee has taught pursuant to the 10    Substitute Teaching License at least 10 full school days 11    within one year of issuance. 12        (1.7) A $25 application fee for a Short-Term 13    Substitute Teaching License. The Short-Term Substitute 14    Teaching License must be registered in at least one region 15    in this State, but does not require a registration fee. 16    The licensee may apply for a refund of the application fee 17    within 18 months of issuance of the new license and shall 18    be issued that refund by the State Board of Education if 19    the licensee provides evidence to the State Board of 20    Education that the licensee has taught pursuant to the 21    Short-Term Substitute Teaching License at least 10 full 22    school days within one year of issuance. The application 23    fee for a Short-Term Substitute Teaching License shall be 24    waived when the Governor has declared a disaster due to a 25    public health emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the 26    Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act.   SB0097- 20 -LRB104 04026 LNS 14050 b1        (2) A $150 application fee for individuals who have 2    not been entitled by an Illinois-approved educator 3    preparation program at an Illinois institution of higher 4    education and are seeking any of the licenses set forth in 5    subdivision (1) of this subsection (a).6        (3) A $50 application fee for each endorsement or 7    approval.8        (4) A $10 per year registration fee for the course of 9    the validity cycle to register the license, which shall be 10    paid to the regional office of education having 11    supervision and control over the school in which the 12    individual holding the license is to be employed. If the 13    individual holding the license is not yet employed, then 14    the license may be registered in any county in this State. 15    The registration fee must be paid in its entirety the 16    first time the individual registers the license for a 17    particular validity period in a single region. No 18    additional fee may be charged for that validity period 19    should the individual subsequently register the license in 20    additional regions. An individual must register the 21    license (i) immediately after initial issuance of the 22    license and (ii) at the beginning of each renewal cycle if 23    the individual has satisfied the renewal requirements 24    required under this Code.25        Beginning on July 1, 2017, at the beginning of each 26    renewal cycle, individuals who hold a Substitute Teaching   SB0097- 21 -LRB104 04026 LNS 14050 b1    License may apply for a reimbursement of the registration 2    fee within 18 months of renewal and shall be issued that 3    reimbursement by the State Board of Education from funds 4    appropriated for that purpose if the licensee provides 5    evidence to the State Board of Education that the licensee 6    has taught pursuant to the Substitute Teaching License at 7    least 10 full school days within one year of renewal. 8        (5) The license renewal fee for an Educator License 9    with Stipulations with a paraprofessional educator 10    endorsement is $25. 11    (b) All application fees paid pursuant to subdivisions (1) 12through (3) of subsection (a) of this Section shall be 13deposited into the Teacher Certificate Fee Revolving Fund and 14shall be used, subject to appropriation, by the State Board of 15Education to provide the technology and human resources 16necessary for the timely and efficient processing of 17applications and for the renewal of licenses. Funds available 18from the Teacher Certificate Fee Revolving Fund may also be 19used by the State Board of Education to support the 20recruitment and retention of educators, to support educator 21preparation programs as they seek national accreditation, and 22to provide professional development aligned with the 23requirements set forth in Section 21B-45 of this Code. A 24majority of the funds in the Teacher Certificate Fee Revolving 25Fund must be dedicated to the timely and efficient processing 26of applications and for the renewal of licenses. The Teacher   SB0097- 22 -LRB104 04026 LNS 14050 b1Certificate Fee Revolving Fund is not subject to 2administrative charge transfers, authorized under Section 8h 3of the State Finance Act, from the Teacher Certificate Fee 4Revolving Fund into any other fund of this State, and moneys in 5the Teacher Certificate Fee Revolving Fund shall not revert 6back to the General Revenue Fund at any time.7    The regional superintendent of schools shall deposit the 8registration fees paid pursuant to subdivision (4) of 9subsection (a) of this Section into the institute fund 10established pursuant to Section 3-11 of this Code.11    (c) The State Board of Education and each regional office 12of education are authorized to charge a service or convenience 13fee for the use of credit cards for the payment of license 14fees. This service or convenience fee shall not exceed the 15amount required by the credit card processing company or 16vendor that has entered into a contract with the State Board or 17regional office of education for this purpose, and the fee 18must be paid to that company or vendor.19    (d) If, at the time a certificate issued under Article 21 20of this Code is exchanged for a license issued under this 21Article, a person has paid registration fees for any years of 22the validity period of the certificate and these years have 23not expired when the certificate is exchanged, then those fees 24must be applied to the registration of the new license.25(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-570, eff. 8-23-19; 26102-867, eff. 5-13-22.)